Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 14

Department of Labor and Workforce Development

4-3-1401. Short title.

The title of this part is, and may be cited as, the “Tennessee Workforce Development Act of 1999.”

Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-1401 (Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 373a30; Code 1932, § 255; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255), concerning creation of the department of labor, was repealed by Acts 1999, ch. 520, §§ 2, 22, effective June 17, 1999.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

4-3-1402. Purpose and intent.

The purpose of this part is to:

Further the implementation of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. § 3101 et seq.);

Reduce duplicative efforts and fully utilize resources by creating an integrated, coordinated, simplified system of workforce development in the state through the consolidation or collaboration of job training, employment, employment-related educational programs, health and safety and unemployment insurance programs in the state; and

Foster public and private sector partnerships designed to provide employment-related services to citizens and employers of the state. It is not the intent of this part to expand or authorize contracting services beyond that authorized under the laws of this state.

References to federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 are deemed references to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

References to the workforce development program are deemed references to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 3; 2015, ch. 57, § 1; 2016, ch. 599, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-1402 (Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 373a32; Code 1932, § 257; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.2; modified), concerning the commissioner of the department of labor, was repealed by Acts 1999, ch. 520, §§ 3, 22, effective June 17, 1999.

4-3-1403. Creation of department.

There is hereby created the department of labor and workforce development.

Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. The department of labor and workforce development, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

Former §4-3-1403, concerning the powers and duties of the department, was transferred to §4-3-1405(h) in 1999.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of labor and workforce development, §4-3-101.

4-3-1404. Purpose and goals of the department.

Through the department of labor and workforce development, Tennessee state government, in cooperation with business and industry, will strive to provide integrated, effective, efficient delivery of employment related services and training, in compliance with the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. § 3101 et seq.), so the state can increase the occupational skill attainment of its workforce and, as a result, improve the quality of the workforce, further the reduction of welfare dependency and enhance the state's productivity and competitiveness in the global economy. The department shall strive to meet the needs of business and industry in this state for the development of a highly skilled and productive workforce.

The department shall strive to meet the needs of employees, unemployed persons, and persons making the transition into the workplace through education, skills training, labor market information, and an efficient unemployment insurance program to enhance their employability, earnings and standard of living while ensuring that employees have a safe, healthy workplace. These services for employees shall focus, whenever possible, on assisting employees to obtain jobs of their choice that provide health insurance, job security and the opportunity for self-sufficiency. The department shall serve as a model employer relative to safety and working conditions in the workplace and in the training and retraining of employees to meet the changes in the work environment. The departments of labor and workforce development and economic and community development shall collaborate relative to job creation, attraction and expansion of business and industry. The department of labor and workforce development shall work to continuously improve the management and coordination of employment-related services for the benefit of business and industry and Tennessee's workforce and shall ensure the taxpayers of this state that revenues for workforce development and unemployment insurance programs are spent effectively and efficiently.

Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 5; 2015, ch. 57, § 2; 2016, ch. 599, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-1404, concerning notice regarding health insurance, was transferred to §4-3-1414 in 1999.

4-3-1405. Powers of the department.

The department of labor and workforce development is designated as the department of this state for the implementation and administration of the following federal programs relating to workforce development, including, but not limited to, the:

Federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. § 3101 et seq.);

Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. § 49 et seq.); and

The former Job Training Partnership Act (29 U.S.C. § 1501 et seq.) [repealed].

The department shall cooperate with all authorities of the United States having powers or duties under the acts of congress mentioned in subsection (a), and shall do and perform all things necessary to secure to this state the benefits of such acts.

Except for the supervisory responsibilities of the department of commerce and insurance, the department of labor and workforce development has full and complete charge of the administration of the Employment Security Law, compiled in title 50, chapter 7, and the state employment service for this state and has the administration of such other functions exercised by the department of employment security or the department of labor, or both, prior to June 17, 1999.

The department of labor and workforce development has full and complete charge of the following:

Adult basic education authorized by the Tennessee Rules, Regulations and Minimum Standards of the state board of education and administered by the department of education prior to June 17, 1999; and

[Deleted by 2017 amendment.]

The department of labor and workforce development shall coordinate the collaborative and cooperative activities and functions of other departments and state agencies and commissions, including, but not limited to, the department of education, the department of human services, the department of economic and community development, and the Tennessee higher education system, including colleges of applied technology and two-year post secondary institutions, to reduce duplication among employment and employment-related training activities in the state, and to maximize Tennessee's efforts to increase the skills of its workforce, foster economic growth through job placement and training services and provide high quality services to its customers including employees, families, business and industry, and particularly those individuals who are economically disadvantaged, dislocated workers, and others with substantial barriers to employment. The department of human services has the responsibility for contracting for the activities required of Families First participants pursuant to § 71-3-104.

The department of labor and workforce development may do all acts and functions necessary or proper to carry out the powers expressly granted under this part, including, but not limited to, entering into agreements or contracts with local governmental units or corporations to provide services that assist the department in carrying out the duties imposed by this part or elsewhere in this code. It is not the intent of this part to create new state authority or to expand any existing authority to contract for services with private entities.

The department of labor and workforce development has authority over such other functions generally, as the governor may lodge with the department by executive order duly signed and filed with the secretary of state.

The department of labor and workforce development has the power to:

Collect information on the subject of labor, its relation to capital, the hours of labor, and the earnings of laboring men and women, and the means of promoting their material, social, intellectual and moral prosperity;

Visit and inspect, as often as necessary, during reasonable hours all shops, factories and mercantile establishments and other places where workers are employed and to cause the law to be enforced therein;

Inspect the sanitary conditions, system of sewerage, system of heating, lighting and ventilation of rooms where persons are employed at labor and the means of exit in case of fire, or other disaster within or connected with shops and factories;

Examine the machinery in and about workshops and factories, to see that it is not located so as to be dangerous to employees when engaged in their ordinary duties;

Declare and prescribe what safety devices, safeguards or other means of protection are well adapted to render employees or places of employment safe;

Order such reasonable changes in the construction, maintenance and repair of places of employment as shall render them safe;

Require the performance of any act necessary for the protection of life, health and safety of employees;

Collect and compile reliable data that, if disseminated, would tend to the development of the state by inducing population and capital to come within its borders; and

Collect and compile accurate listings of employers who do not comply with § 50-6-405.

Activities associated with Title V of the federal Older Americans Act of 1965 (42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq.) shall be administered by the department. Funding to community providers pursuant to a grant or contract with the commission on aging and disability in effect on June 30, 2003, shall continue so long as federal funding continues and each provider continues to meet program goals and requirements and complies with any applicable audit and financial accountability laws.

To the extent permitted by any federal law or rule, regulation, guideline, or advisory opinion of the internal revenue service, the department shall accept and process any IRS Form 8850, or any successor to such form, that is submitted with electronic signatures in the same manner as the department accepts such forms when submitted with physical signatures if such form is submitted to the department by mail, facsimile, or e-mail copy.

For purposes of this subsection (j), “electronic signatures” includes a physical printout of an electronically signed IRS Form 8850 indicating that the signature field is “signed electronically”.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 55; Shan. Supp., § 373a118; mod. Code 1932, § 335; Acts 1935, ch. 165, §§ 1, 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 335 (Williams, §§ 335, 5347.1, 5347.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-316; modified; Acts 1986, ch. 844, §§ 4, 7; 1999, ch. 520, §§ 6, 23; T.C.A., §4-3-1403; Acts 2003, ch. 311, § 2; 2012, ch. 923, § 1; 2013, ch. 473, § 8; 2015, ch. 57, § 3; 2015, ch. 341, § 1; 2016, ch. 599, § 5; 2017, ch. 461, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The former Job Training Partnership Act, referred to in this section, formerly compiled in 29 U.S.C. § 1501 et seq., was repealed by Act Aug. 7, 1998, P.L. 105-220, title I, subtitle F, § 199(b)(2), 112 Stat. 1059, effective on July 1, 2000.

Cross-References. Employers and employees, title 50.

4-3-1406. Commissioner.

The department of labor and workforce development shall be under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of labor and workforce development.

Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 7.

4-3-1407. Powers and duties of commissioner.

The commissioner of labor and workforce development or the commissioner's designee has the following powers and duties, in addition to such other powers and duties as may be specifically provided by law in this title, transferred by this part or as otherwise provided by law:

Develop and implement activities and programs that foster the continued enhancement of Tennessee's workforce;

Ensure the maintenance of a fair, equitable and fully funded unemployment insurance program; and

Be responsible for the administration of a workforce development system that protects the life, health and safety of Tennessee's workforce.

Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 8.

4-3-1408. Divisions — Creation — Office of administrator.

In addition to the creation of the division of the Tennessee state employment service within the department of labor and workforce development as provided in § 50-7-601, there are created within the department, the following divisions:

The division of employment security;

The bureau of workers' compensation; and

The division of occupational safety and health.

The division of employment security and the division of occupational health and safety shall be under the supervision and charge of the commissioner of labor and workforce development, and shall be separate administrative entities for programs, personnel, and budgets. The bureau of workers' compensation shall also be a separate administrative entity for programs, personnel, and budgets; the supervision and charge of the division shall be in accordance with § 4-3-1409.

The office of administrator is hereby created for each division created pursuant to subdivisions (a)(1)-(3). The administrator shall have the general administrative authority of the division.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the administrator of the division of employment security is responsible, to the greatest extent possible, for administering, implementing, and enforcing title 50, chapter 7, and any rules or regulations promulgated in accordance with such chapter that are within the purview of employment security, but not including WOTC alien certification, veterans' programs and the Tennessee state employment service. The administrator shall have a minimum of five (5) years' credible experience in the field of employment security and shall have a comprehensive knowledge of and experience in the operation and programs of the division. The administrator shall be recognized by the representatives of the business and labor communities as a person of good standing and reputation in matters concerning employment security.

The administrator of the bureau of workers' compensation is responsible for administering, implementing, and enforcing all of the provisions enacted into law and compiled in title 50, chapter 6, and any rules or regulations promulgated in accordance with such chapter.

The administrator of the division of occupational safety and health shall be responsible for administering, implementing, and enforcing all of the provisions enacted into law and compiled in title 50, chapter 3, and any rules or regulations promulgated in accordance with such chapter. The administrator shall have a minimum of five (5) years' credible experience in the field of occupational safety and health and shall have a comprehensive knowledge of and experience in the operation and programs of the division. The administrator shall be recognized by the representatives of the business and labor communities as a person of good standing and reputation in matters concerning occupational safety and health.

In addition to other duties, each administrator is responsible for preparing and submitting to the commissioner of labor and workforce development an annual budget for the division the administrator heads.

The administrators of the division of employment security and the division of occupational safety and health shall be appointed by the commissioner of labor and workforce development for a term of four (4) years. The first appointment shall be made July 1, 1999, or as soon as practical thereafter. The four-year terms shall begin on July 1 and end on June 30 of appropriate years. The commissioner of labor and workforce development has the authority to remove an administrator only for nonperformance of duties and responsibilities. If removed, a vacancy shall exist in the office of the administrator. A vacancy in the office shall be filled for the unexpired term with a person meeting the requirements applicable to the original appointee.

The administrator of the bureau of workers' compensation shall be appointed in the manner provided in § 4-3-1409.

The transfer of the functions and activities of the various departments and programs to the department of labor and workforce development shall not, because of the transfer, result in any preferred service employee suffering loss of employment, compensation, benefits, or state service status. Such rights, benefits, and compensation shall continue without any impairment, interruption, or diminution; provided, that the department may engage in disciplinary actions or reductions in force as provided for by law. The commissioner of human resources is authorized to enforce this section and shall determine whenever the rights, benefits, and compensation are impaired, interrupted, or diminished. Any employee aggrieved by any impairment in violation of this section shall have the right to seek redress through the grievance procedure established in § 8-30-318.

Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 9; 2012, ch. 800, § 49; 2013, ch. 289, § 1; 2015, ch. 341, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. The bureau of workers' compensation, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (c), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Excellence, Accountability, and Management (T.E.A.M.) Act of 2012.”

Acts 2013, ch. 289, § 103 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Workers' Compensation Reform Act of 2013.”

Attorney General Opinions. The administrator of the division of employment security has control of the funds, budget, and personnel provided for the employment security programs, OAG 01-093, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 84 (6/4/01).

4-3-1409. Independence of the bureau of workers' compensation
— Bureau under the charge and general supervision of the administrator of the bureau — Powers and duties of administrator —Appointment of administrator.

In recognition of Tennessee's endeavor to reform the workers' compensation law in a manner designed to ensure the health and safety of Tennessee workers and to promote Tennessee as an attractive destination for business, the general assembly has determined that the independence of the bureau of workers' compensation is paramount. The bureau of workers' compensation shall be an autonomous unit that shall be attached to the department of labor and workforce development for administrative matters only.

The bureau of workers' compensation shall be under the charge and general supervision of the administrator.

The administrator or the administrator's designee has the following powers and duties, in addition to other powers and duties specifically provided by law:

Development and maintenance of an organizational structure to ensure fair, equitable, expeditious, and efficient administration of the workers' compensation law; and

Responsibility for the administration of a workers' compensation system that protects the life, health, and safety of Tennessee's workforce and ensures the continued viability of Tennessee's business environment.

The administrator of the bureau of workers' compensation shall be appointed by the governor for a term of six (6) years. No administrator shall serve more than two (2) full terms, and service of more than half of a six-year term shall constitute service of one (1) full term; provided, that any administrator appointed to serve less than a full term to fill a vacancy created by the removal or resignation of the previous administrator shall be eligible to serve an additional two (2) full terms. The first appointment shall be made July 1, 2013, or as soon as practical thereafter. The first six-year term shall begin on July 1, 2013, and end on June 30, 2019. Thereafter, all terms shall begin on July 1 and end, six (6) years later, on June 30 of the following years. The governor has the authority to remove the administrator for nonperformance of duties and responsibilities or for cause. If the administrator is removed or resigns, a vacancy shall exist in the office, which shall be filled for the unexpired term by a person meeting the requirements of subdivision (c)(2).

The administrator shall have a minimum of seven (7) years' credible experience in the field of workers' compensation and shall have a comprehensive knowledge of and experience in the operation and programs of the workers' compensation industry. The administrator shall be recognized by the representatives of the business and labor communities as a person of good standing and reputation in matters concerning workers' compensation.

Acts 2013, ch. 289, § 2; 2015, ch. 341, § 16.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §4-3-1409 (Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 10), concerning transfer of programs and personnel, offices, equipment, supplies, property, facilities, funds and other resources, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2005.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 289, § 103 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Workers' Compensation Reform Act of 2013.”

4-3-1410. Funds.

The department of labor and workforce development, through its commissioner, has the authority to receive, administer, allocate, disburse and supervise any grants and funds from whatever sources, including, but not limited to, the federal, state, county and municipal governments on a state, regional, county or other basis, with respect to any programs and/or responsibilities outlined in this part or assigned to the department by law, regulation or order. Exercise of this authority shall not be inconsistent with laws or regulations governing the appropriation and disbursement of funds for the administration of employment security law under title 50, chapter 7, or the department of finance and administration.

All funds received by the department of labor and workforce development for the purpose or administration of the state unemployment insurance program, the state employment service, workers' compensation and the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1972, compiled in title 50, chapter 3, shall have their separate identities maintained and shall be expended only for the intended purpose.

Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 11.

4-3-1411. Orders, rules and regulations, decisions and policies.

The department of labor and workforce development, through its commissioner, has the authority, consistent with the statutes and regulations pertaining to the programs and functions transferred by chapter 520 of the Public Acts of 1999, to modify or rescind orders, rules and regulations, decisions or policies heretofore issued and to adopt, issue or promulgate new orders, rules and regulations, decisions or policies as may be necessary for the administration of the programs or functions transferred by chapter 520 of the Public Acts of 1999.

Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 12.

4-3-1412. Nondiscrimination.

In compliance with all federal and state laws and constitutional provisions prohibiting discrimination, including, but not limited to, the Civil Rights Act of 1964, Title VI (42 U.S.C. § 2000d), no person, on the grounds of race, color, national origin, age or sex shall be excluded from participation, be denied the benefits of, or be otherwise subjected to discrimination under, any program or activity operated by the department of labor and workforce development. This includes, but is not limited to, contracts for services, employment or services to the department's customers.

Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. For an Order establishing the Tennessee Title VI Compliance Commission, see Executive Order No. 34 (August 9, 2002).

Law Reviews.

Government Contractors Beware: Recent Changes to Federal Affirmative Action Requirements (James Francis Barna), 37 No. 9 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2001).

4-3-1413. [Reserved.]

The commissioner of labor and workforce development, in performing the duties established in title 5, shall also require every business or entity that sponsors a group medical benefit contract in this state to include in each notice issued pursuant to the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (29 U.S.C. § 1166 or 42 U.S.C. § 300bb-6), and related laws and regulations, the following additional language:

You may be entitled to have the state of Tennessee pay the premium for your ongoing health insurance. For more information, contact your local department of human services.

Acts 1991, ch. 420, § 2; T.C.A., §4-3-1404; Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 24.

4-3-1415. Maintenance and expenditure of funds.

All funds to the credit of the unemployment compensation division of the United States department of labor and to the credit of the state employment service, transferred to the credit of the department of labor and workforce development, shall have their separate identities maintained, and only funds allocated to each of those divisions may be expended by such unit.

Acts 1945, ch. 34, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.70 (Williams, § 255.71a); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-318; T.C.A., §4-3-904; Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 20.

4-3-1416. Distribution of sexual harassment rules.

The department of labor and workforce development shall, in consultation with the human rights commission, promulgate rules that provide for the distribution, in one (1) of the department's regular mailings to the employers, of the state materials explaining the sexual harassment rules of the state human rights commission. These materials, which the employer shall make available to its employees, may be in the form of a poster, brochure, or pamphlet.

Acts 1993, ch. 307, § 5; T.C.A., §4-3-905; Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 21.

Cross-References. Posting of sexual harassment policy by state entities, §4-3-124.

Prevention of sexual harassment, §§3-13-101,4-3-124,4-3-1703,49-7-122.

Law Reviews.

What Part of “No” Don't You Understand?: Recent Developments in Workplace Sexual Harassment Law (William D. Evans Jr.), 36 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2000).

4-3-1417. Discrimination prohibited.

In making appointments to any board, commission or panel that is administratively attached to the department, the appointing authority shall not discriminate against any person on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, national origin, age, religious belief, sex, or disability. The appointing authority shall strive to ensure that the makeup of all boards, commissions and panels attached to the department reflect and represent the diversity of persons in Tennessee.

Acts 2005, ch. 407, § 5; 2015, ch. 57, § 4.

4-3-1418. [Reserved.]

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall notify each applicant for a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, division, board, commission, agency or other governmental entity where to obtain a copy of any statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines setting forth the prerequisites for the license, certification or registration and shall, upon request, make available to the applicant a copy of the statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall notify each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, division, board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity of changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines, upon the issuance and upon each renewal of a holder's license, certification or registration.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall establish and maintain a link or links on the entity's website to the statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines that are implemented or enforced by the entity and that impact an applicant for, or a holder of, a professional or occupational license, certification, or registration from the entity.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, agency, or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall allow each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, division, board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity to have the option of being notified by electronic mail of:

Renewals of the holder's license, certification or registration;

Any fee increases;

Any changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies and guidelines; and

Any meeting where changes in rules or fees are on the agenda. For purposes of this subdivision (d)(1)(D), the electronic notice shall be at least forty-five (45) days in advance of the meeting, unless it is an emergency meeting then the notice shall be sent as soon as is practicable.

The department and any division, board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity under the jurisdiction of, or administratively attached to, the department shall notify each holder of a license, certification or registration of the availability of receiving electronic notices pursuant to subdivision (d)(1) upon issuance or renewal of the holder's license, certification or registration.

Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 9; 2012, ch. 952, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 13 provided that each entity subject to the act shall promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-3-1420. We Want to Learn English Initiative.

The department of labor and workforce development, in conjunction with the department of education, shall establish and administer a grant program to be known as the “We Want to Learn English Initiative.” The initiative shall be created for the purpose of providing resources for immigrants and refugees in this state to learn English in order to move toward becoming full members of American society.

The department shall utilize existing staff to assist in the implementation of the program and provide grant funding from whatever funding sources available, including, but not limited to, funds from the federal, state, county and municipal governments.

The department of labor and workforce development shall allocate and disperse funds each fiscal year to community-based, not-for-profit organizations, immigrant social service organizations, faith-based organizations and on-site job training programs so that immigrants and refugees can learn English where they live, work, pray and socialize and where their children attend school.

Funds for the We Want to Learn English Initiative may be used only to provide programs that teach English to United States citizens, lawful permanent residents and other persons residing in this state who are in lawful immigration status.

Acts 2009, ch. 366, § 1.

4-3-1421. Program for payment of the cost of licensing tests for adult students with financial need.

The department of labor and workforce development, in conjunction with the department of education, is encouraged to consider the development, implementation and administration of a program for payment of the cost of licensing tests for adult students with financial need who complete a high school diploma or a general educational development (GED(R)) credential in a career and technical education program and who are required to take a test in order to become licensed for a career in their fields of study.

Acts 2010, ch. 1057, § 1.

4-3-1422. Lois M. DeBerry Alternative Diploma Act — Assessments that lead to high school equivalency credential.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Lois M. DeBerry Alternative Diploma Act.”

The department of labor and workforce development is authorized to make recommendations relative to assessments that lead to the award of a high school equivalency credential. The state board shall review the recommendations of the department. Any recommendation approved by the state board of education shall be considered a high school equivalency assessment and the successful completion of such assessment shall lead to the award of a high school equivalency credential. The department, as needed, may consult with or request assistance from other state agencies in performing its duties under this section.

Acts 2012, ch. 787, § 2; 2013, ch. 448, § 1.